Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201848-629
Claims; rules and regulations for filing.

Claims for benefits shall be made in accordance with such rules and regulations as the commissioner may adopt and promulgate. Each employer shall post and maintain printed statements of such rules and regulations in places readily accessible to individuals in his or her service and shall make available to each such individual, at the time he or she becomes unemployed, a printed statement of such rules and regulations. Such printed statements shall be supplied by the commissioner to each employer without cost to the employer.

Laws 1937, c. 108, § 6, p. 378;

Laws 1941, c. 94, § 4, p. 384;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 48-706;

R.S.1943, § 48-629;

Laws 1985, LB 339, § 24;

Laws 2017, LB172, § 48.

Claims for benefits were filed under this section. A. Borchman Sons v. Carpenter, 166 Neb. 322, 89 N.W.2d 123 (1958).